Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1016
Watercourse, defined.

Watercourse shall mean any depression two feet or more below the surrounding land which serves to give direction to a current of water at least nine months of the year and which has a bed and well-defined banks.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 16.